District of Columbia statutes.
16-3905

Jury trial; demand; assignment to regular branch.

In a case filed or pending in the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch in which a party entitled to a trial by jury files a demand therefor, the case shall be assigned to and tried in the regular branch of the civil division of the Court under the procedure provided for jury trials.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 610, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(p)(4)
1981 Ed., § 16-3905.
1973 Ed., § 16-3905.